Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.315

Automatic voter registration—Application for government services requiring proof of citizenship.

A person applying for government services which require proof of citizenship as part of that application may receive automatic voter registration services by providing the following information:

(1) Name;

(2) Residential address;

(3) Date of birth;

(4) A signature attesting to the truth of the information provided on the application;

(5) An address where the person receives mail, if different from the residence address; and

(6) Presentation of documentation as part of another government transaction confirming the individual is a United States citizen.

[ 2023 c 466 s 1.]